District of Columbia statutes.
2-1345

Repealed

Regulations to implement translation program.

Repealed.

Oct. 26, 1977, D.C. Law 2-31, § 5, 24 DCR 3724
June 19, 2004, D.C. Law 15-167, § 8(b), 51 DCR 4688
1981 Ed., § 1-2345.
1973 Ed., § 6-1945.